Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3253] Director; duties. The
center shall be headed by a director, who need not be full-time, depending upon
the extent of the requests for research assistance and for carrying out the
other specified functions of the center. The director shall not be subject to
chapter 76.

The director shall:

(1) Administer funds allocated for the center;

(2) Be authorized to accept, disburse, and allocate
funds that become available from other governmental and private sources; and

(3) Submit an annual report of the center's
operations, including recommendations, to the governor and legislature prior to
January 1 of each year. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next